California, session 20252026, SB1133.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Ready to Learn, Ready for Health Act.SEC. 2.Section 33546.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:33546.5.When the “Health Education Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised, on or after January 1, 2027, the commission shall consider including information on evidence-based preventative health instruction, including information on nutrition, food literacy, sleep, movement, stress management, and digital balance.SEC. 2. Section 33546.7 is added to the Education Code, to read:33546.7. When the “Health Education Framework for California Public Schools” (health framework) is next revised, on or after January 1, 2027, the commission shall consider including information on evidence-based preventative health instruction, including information on nutrition, food literacy, sleep, movement, stress management, and digital balance in an integrated manner that discusses these key health factors and the interrelationship and balance between them. The information to be considered for inclusion shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following topics:(a) How nutrition affects metabolism, inflammation, and long-term disease risk.(b) The role of exercise and physical activity in physical and mental health.(c) How stress and sleep influence hormones, weight, immunity, and cognition.(d) The impacts and responsible use of social media, artificial intelligence, and digital platforms.(e) How environmental factors such as air quality, water quality, and food environments impact health.(f) How daily choices influence the body and mental health.